Tennessee, session 114, HB2491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 40, Chapter 3, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following new section:
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, upon the enactment of the cost
authorized by § 40-3-106, the fees and assessments established in this part for fraud
and economic crimes must not be enforced within that county. Any existing funds
collected under this part that are in the possession, custody, or control of a district
attorney general must be held and retained by the district attorney general until the
balance of the funds collected pursuant to § 40-3-106 equals or exceeds the balance of
the fraud and economic crimes prosecution funds deposited into the account established
by § 40-3-207, at which time the balance of the funds deposited into the account
established by § 40-3-207 must revert to and be remitted back to the county government
of original assessment and collection.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2491
010794
- 1 -